Idaho, session 2025, H0421.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 8, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-838, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-838. CYBERSECURITY AND RESILIENCY FUND. (1) There is hereby cre-
ated in the state treasury the cybersecurity and resiliency fund. The fund
shall consist of moneys that may be provided by legislative appropriation or
transfer. The state treasurer shall invest the idle moneys of the fund, and
the interest earned on such investments shall be retained by the fund.
(2) All moneys now or hereafter in the cybersecurity and resiliency
fund shall be used to address the state's ongoing needs for information tech-
nology infrastructure and cybersecurity technology.
(3) The office of information technology services shall create a five
(5) year plan for replacement of information technology infrastructure and
cybersecurity technology. Every year, the office of information technol-
ogy services shall update the plan and submit it to the division of financial
management as a part of the annual budget process. The office of information
technology services shall also account for and provide information regard-
ing any money spent from the fund during the previous fiscal year.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Cybersecurity technology" means technology used to protect net-
works, devices, and data from unauthorized access or criminal use and
includes network and data center security, endpoint security, cloud se-
curity, security information and event management, data protection and
recovery, data encryption, identity protection, incident response, se-
curity awareness training and audits, penetration testing, technology
resilience, and redundancy measures.
(b) "Information technology infrastructure" means network infrastruc-
ture and computers and storage, including desktops and laptops.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.